Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Armed private investigator" means a private investigator who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is licensed as an armed private investigator under this chapter.

(2) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its jurisdiction.

(3) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission established in chapter 43.101 RCW.

(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(6) "Employer" includes any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent of any of the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an arrangement to employ any person as a private investigator.

(7) "Firearms certificate" means a certificate issued by the commission.

(8) "Forensic scientist" or "accident reconstructionist" means a person engaged exclusively in collecting and analyzing physical evidence and data relating to an accident or other matter and compiling such evidence or data to render an opinion of likely cause, fault, or circumstance of the accident or matter.

(9) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee of any of the foregoing.

(10) "Principal" of a private investigator agency means the owner or manager appointed by a corporation.

(11) "Private investigator" means a person who is licensed under this chapter and is employed by a private investigator agency for the purpose of investigation, escort or body guard services, or property loss prevention activities.

(12) "Private investigator agency" means a person or entity licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of detecting, discovering, or revealing one or more of the following:

(a) Crime, criminals, or related information;

(b) The identity, habits, conduct, business, occupation, honesty, integrity, credibility, knowledge, trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement, whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of any person or thing;

(c) The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property;

(d) The cause or responsibility for fires, libels, losses, accidents, or damage or injury to persons or to property;

(e) Evidence to be used before a court, board, officer, or investigative committee;

(f) Detecting the presence of electronic eavesdropping devices; or

(g) The truth or falsity of a statement or representation.

(13) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a private investigator agency license.

(14) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an employee of the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision, agency, or department branch of a municipality or other unit of local government, and has law enforcement powers.

[ 1995 c 277 s 17; 1991 c 328 s 1.]